Utah statutes.
17C-1-605.   Audit report.

(1)  Each agency required to be audited under Section 17C-1-604 shall, within 180 days after the end of the agency's fiscal year, file a copy of the audit report with the county auditor, the State Tax Commission, the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies a tax on property from which the agency collects tax increment.

(2)  Each audit report under Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  the tax increment collected by the agency for each project area;

(b)  the amount of tax increment paid to each taxing entity under Section 17C-1-410;

(c)  the outstanding principal amount of bonds issued or other loans incurred to finance the costs associated with the agency's project areas; and

(d)  the actual amount expended for:

(i)  acquisition of property;

(ii)  site improvements or site preparation costs;

(iii)  installation of public utilities or other public improvements; and

(iv)  administrative costs of the agency.

